Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-708
Telephone lines; notice of widening of roads; when given.

Whenever any county or township road construction, widening, repair, or grading project requires, or can reasonably be expected to require, the performance of any work within six feet of any telephone line, poles, or anchors, notice to the owner of such line, poles, or anchors shall be given by the respective county or township officers in charge of such projects. Such notice shall be given at least thirty days prior to the start of any work when, because of road construction, widening, repair, or grading, or for any other reason, it is necessary to relocate such line, poles, or anchors.

Laws 1957, c. 400, § 1, p. 1368;

Laws 1959, c. 181, § 19, p. 662;

Laws 1994, LB 421, § 31;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-334;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 413.